District of Columbia statutes.
47-318.01b

Legislative branch budget submission.

(a)

At least 20 days prior to the Mayor’s submission of the annual budget to the Council, the Chairman of the Council shall transmit to the Mayor an estimate in detail of the amount of money required for the:

(1)

Council;

(2)

Office of the District of Columbia Auditor; and

(3)

Office of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions for the ensuing fiscal year.

(b)

The Mayor shall transmit the same estimate required by subsection (a) of this section in his annual estimate of appropriations for the District of Columbia, with such recommendations as he may consider proper.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1081(b), 57 DCR 181

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1081(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1081(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 1080 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle I of title I of the act may be cited as the “Legislative Branch Budget Submission Act of 2009”.

Short Title